Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2005.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 32, chapter 32, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 32-3230.03, to read: START_STATUTE32-3230.03. Vaccination status; unprofessional conduct It is an act of unprofessional conduct for a health professional to deny health care or to provide health care that is less than the standard of care to a person based on the person's vaccination status. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 36, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-420.06, to read: START_STATUTE36-420.06. Health care institutions; vaccination status; discriminatory policies; prohibition A health care institution may not adopt a policy that allows a health professional to deny health care or to provide health care that is less than the standard of care to a person based on the person's vaccination status. END_STATUTE